Hawaii statutes.
§107-4 Duties of counties relating to maps,
surveyors, reports. Whenever any maps and metes and bounds descriptions
are made by any county department or agency, a certified copy of such map and
metes and bounds description shall be filed with the department of accounting
and general services. The land surveyors employed by county departments and
agencies shall perform their surveying duties in conformance with professional
standards to be prescribed by the department and shall report to it from time to
time as may be required. [L 1951, c 283, §2; RL 1955, §103-2; am L Sp 1959 2d,
c 1, §12; HRS §107-4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next